testing/myv-tests-noun.yaml
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксеськак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксеськак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонокседентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонокседентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксевтомонтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксевтомонтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнескак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнескак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетневаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетневаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетневгак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетневгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетненеккак
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакавтомоноксетненеккак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканксекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканксекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксеськак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксеськак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентеньгак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксентеньгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканкседентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевтементькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксевтементькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксешкантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксешкантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнескак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнескак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневгак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненеккак
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакашканксетненеккак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседеяк
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседеяк
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксекскак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксекскак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксеськак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксеськак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксентеньгак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседентькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонокседентькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксесэнтькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксестэнтькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевантькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксевтементькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксешкантькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксешкантькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксексэнтькак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнеяк
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетненьгак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнененьгак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнедеяк
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнесэяк
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнестэяк
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнескак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнескак
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневаяк
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетневаяк
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнекскак
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакасоноксетнекскак
